Utah statutes.
31A-22-726.   Abortion coverage restriction in health benefit plan and on health insurance exchange.

(1)  As used in this section, "permitted abortion coverage" means coverage for abortion:

(a)  that is necessary to avert:

(i)  the death of the woman on whom the abortion is performed; or

(ii)  a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the woman on whom the abortion is performed;

(b)  of a fetus that has a defect that is documented by a physician or physicians to be uniformly diagnosable and uniformly lethal; or

(c)  where the woman is pregnant as a result of:

(i)  rape, as described in Section 76-5-402;

(ii)  rape of a child, as described in Section 76-5-402.1; or

(iii)  incest, as described in Subsection 76-5-406(10) or Section 76-7-102.

(2)  A person may not offer coverage for an abortion in a health benefit plan, unless the coverage is a type of permitted abortion coverage.

(3)  A person may not offer a health benefit plan that provides coverage for an abortion in a health insurance exchange created under Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 25, Health System Reform Act, unless the coverage is a type of permitted abortion coverage.

(4)  A person may not offer a health benefit plan that provides coverage for an abortion in a health insurance exchange created under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, 111 P.L. 148, unless the coverage is a type of permitted abortion coverage.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2011 General Session

